Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4206
Department of Health and Human Services; Office of Probation Administration; cooperate with Nebraska Children's Commission.

The Department of Health and Human Services and the Office of Probation Administration shall fully cooperate with the Nebraska Children's Commission. The department shall provide to the commission all requested information on children and juveniles in Nebraska, including, but not limited to, departmental reports, data, programs, processes, finances, and policies.

Laws 2012, LB821, § 6;

Laws 2019, LB600, § 7.